test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/VTI_AM_IND_waabandam_gt-glossing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  VTI - AM - waabandam :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4   5
  #per	neg     num     mod periph
     
     #this is pulled from book (p 311)
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     waabndaan+VTI+3+4: waabndamni 

     #Values from slots numbered 1, 3
     1+waabndaan+VTI+0: nwaabndaan
     1+waabndaan+VTI+1+Pl: [nwaabndaanaa, nwaabndaami]
     2+waabndaan+VTI+0: gwaabndaan
     2+waabndaan+VTI+1+Pl: [gwaabndaanaa, gwaabndaami]
     2+waabndaan+VTI+2+Pl: gwaabndaanaawaa
     3+waabndaan+VTI+0: waabndaan #book has "struc w"
     3+waabndaan+VTI+2+Pl: waabndaanaawaa #book has "struc w", final (error!) n
     #waabndaan+VTI+X: NO IDEA
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     #waabndaan+VTI+3+4+Prt: NO IDEA may need a third person prefix anyway, book indicates -w is 3 with no exp
     #waabndaan+VTI+3+4+Dub: NO IDEA may need a third person prefix anyway, book indicates -w is 3 with no exp
     waabndaan+VTI+3+4+Prt+Dub: waabndamnigba #book omits struc w

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+waabndaan+VTI+0+Prt: nwaabndaanaaba
     1+waabndaan+VTI+1+Pl+Prt: nwaabndaamnaaba
     2+waabndaan+VTI+0+Prt: gwaabndaanaaba
     2+waabndaan+VTI+1+Pl+Prt: gwaabndaamnaaba
     2+waabndaan+VTI+2+Pl+Prt: gwaabndaanaawaaba
     3+waabndaan+VTI+0+Prt: waabndaanaaba #book has "struc w"
     3+waabndaan+VTI+2+Pl+Prt: waabndaanaawaaba #book has "struc w"
     #waabndaan+VTI+X+Prt: NO IDEA
     1+waabndaan+VTI+0+Dub: nwaabndaanaadig
     1+waabndaan+VTI+1+Pl+Dub: nwaabndaamnaadig
     2+waabndaan+VTI+0+Dub: gwaabndaanaadig
     2+waabndaan+VTI+1+Pl+Dub: gwaabndaamnaadig
     2+waabndaan+VTI+2+Pl+Dub: gwaabndaanaawaadig
     3+waabndaan+VTI+0+Dub: waabndaanaadig #book has "struc w"
     3+waabndaan+VTI+2+Pl+Dub: waabndaanaawaadig #book has "struc w"
     #waabndaan+VTI+X+Dub: NO IDEA
     3+waabndaan+VTI+Prt+Dub: waabndamgoba #book omits struc w
     3+waabndaan+VTI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: waabndamgwaaba #book omits struc w
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     #waabndaan+VTI+3+4+0+Pl: waabndamniwan #? book mum, may not be possible 

     #Values from slots numbered 1, 3, 5
     1+waabndaan+VTI+0+0+Pl: nwaabndaanan
     1+waabndaan+VTI+1+Pl+0+Pl: [nwaabndaamnan, nwaabndaanaanin]
     2+waabndaan+VTI+0+0+Pl: gwaabndaanan
     2+waabndaan+VTI+1+Pl+0+Pl: [gwaabndaanaanin, gwaabndaamnan]
     2+waabndaan+VTI+2+Pl+0+Pl: gwaabndaanaawaan
     3+waabndaan+VTI+0+0+Pl: waabndaanan #book has "struc w"
     3+waabndaan+VTI+2+Pl+0+Pl: waabndaanaawaan #book has "struc w", final (error!) n
     #waabndaan+VTI+X: NO IDEA

     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5
     #waabndaan+VTI+3+4+Prt+0+Pl: NO IDEA
     #waabndaan+VTI+3+4+Dub+0+Pl: NO IDEA

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     1+waabndaan+VTI+0+Prt+0+Pl: nwaabndaanaabniin
     1+waabndaan+VTI+1+Pl+Prt+0+Pl: nwaabndaamnaabniin
     2+waabndaan+VTI+0+Prt+0+Pl: gwaabndaanaabniin
     2+waabndaan+VTI+1+Pl+Prt+0+Pl: gwaabndaamnaabniin
     2+waabndaan+VTI+2+Pl+Prt+0+Pl: gwaabndaanaawaabniin
     3+waabndaan+VTI+0+Prt+0+Pl: waabndaanaabniin #book has "struc w"
     3+waabndaan+VTI+2+Pl+Prt+0+Pl: waabndaanaawaabniin #book has "struc w"
     #waabndaan+VTI+X+Prt+0+Pl: NO IDEA
     1+waabndaan+VTI+0+Dub+0+Pl: nwaabndaanaadgenan
     1+waabndaan+VTI+1+Pl+Dub+0+Pl: nwaabndaamnaadgenan
     2+waabndaan+VTI+0+Dub+0+Pl: gwaabndaanaadgenan
     2+waabndaan+VTI+1+Pl+Dub+0+Pl: gwaabndaamnaadgenan
     2+waabndaan+VTI+2+Pl+Dub+0+Pl: gwaabndaanaawaadgenan
     3+waabndaan+VTI+0+Dub+0+Pl: waabndaanaadgenan #book has "struc w"
     3+waabndaan+VTI+2+Pl+Dub+0+Pl: waabndaanaawaadgenan #book has "struc w"
     #waabndaan+VTI+X+Dub+0+Pl: NO IDEA

     #most neg forms had to be synthesized, since ref grammar is extremely incomplete here
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     waabndaan+VTI+Neg+3+4: waabndanziini 

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+0: nwaabndanziin
     1+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+1+Pl: [nwaabndanziimi, nwaabndanziinaa]
     2+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+0: gwaabndanziin
     2+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+1+Pl: [gwaabndanziimi, gwaabndanziinaa]
     2+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+2+Pl: gwaabndanziinaawaa
     3+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+0: waabndanziin #book has "struc w"
     3+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+2+Pl: waabndanziinaawaa #book has "struc w", final (error!) n
     #waabndaan+VTI+Neg+X: NO IDEA
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4
     #waabndaan+VTI+Neg+3+4+Prt: NO IDEA may need a 3 prefix book puts -w for 3 with no explanation?
     #waabndaan+VTI+Neg+3+4+Dub: NO IDEA may need a 3 prefix book puts -w for 3 with no explanation?
     waabndaan+VTI+Neg+3+4+Prt+Dub: waabndanziin'goba #' #book omits struc w

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     1+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+0+Prt: nwaabndanziinaaba
     1+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt: nwaabndanziimnaaba
     2+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+0+Prt: gwaabndanziinaaba
     2+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt: gwaabndanziimnaaba
     2+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt: gwaabndanziinaawaaba
     3+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+0+Prt: waabndanziinaaba #book has "struc w"
     3+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt: waabndanziinaawaaba #book has "struc w"
     #waabndaan+VTI+Neg+X+Prt: NO IDEA
     1+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+0+Dub: nwaabndanziinaadig
     1+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub: nwaabndanziimnaadig
     2+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+0+Dub: gwaabndanziinaadig
     2+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub: gwaabndanziimnaadig
     2+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub: gwaabndanziinaawaadig
     3+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+0+Dub: waabndanziinaadig #book has "struc w"
     3+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub: waabndanziinaawaadig #book has "struc w"
     #waabndaan+VTI+Neg+X+Dub: NO IDEA
     3+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+Prt+Dub: waabndanziigba #book omits struc w
     3+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: waabndanziigwaaba #book omits struc w
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5
     #waabndaan+VTI+Neg+3+4+0+Pl: waabndamniwan #? book mum, may not be possible 

     #Values from slots numbered 1, 2, 3, 5
     1+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+0+0+Pl: nwaabndanziinan
     1+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+1+Pl+0+Pl: [nwaabndanziimnan, nwaabndanziinaanin]
     2+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+0+0+Pl: gwaabndanziinan
     2+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+1+Pl+0+Pl: [gwaabndanziimnan, gwaabndanziinaanin]
     2+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+2+Pl+0+Pl: gwaabndanziinaawaan
     3+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+0+0+Pl: waabndanziinan #book has "struc w"
     3+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+2+Pl+0+Pl: waabndanziinaawaan #book has "struc w", final (error!) n
     #waabndaan+VTI+Neg+X: NO IDEA

     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5
     #waabndaan+VTI+Neg+3+4+Prt+0+Pl: NO IDEA
     #waabndaan+VTI+Neg+3+4+Dub+0+Pl: NO IDEA

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     1+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+0+Prt+0+Pl: nwaabndanziinaabniin
     1+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+0+Pl: nwaabndanziimnaabniin
     2+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+0+Prt+0+Pl: gwaabndanziinaabniin
     2+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+0+Pl: gwaabndanziimnaabniin
     2+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+0+Pl: gwaabndanziinaawaabniin
     3+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+0+Prt+0+Pl: waabndanziinaabniin #book has "struc w"
     3+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+0+Pl: waabndanziinaawaabniin #book has "struc w"
     #waabndaan+VTI+Neg+X+Prt+0+Pl: NO IDEA
     1+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+0+Dub+0+Pl: nwaabndanziinaadgenan
     1+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+0+Pl: nwaabndanziimnaadgenan
     2+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+0+Dub+0+Pl: gwaabndanziinaadgenan
     2+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+0+Pl: gwaabndanziimnaadgenan
     2+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+0+Pl: gwaabndanziinaawaadgenan
     3+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+0+Dub+0+Pl: waabndanziinaadgenan #book has "struc w"
     3+waabndaan+VTI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+0+Pl: waabndanziinaawaadgenan #book has "struc w"
     #waabndaan+VTI+Neg+X+Dub+0+Pl: NO IDEA
